North Carolina, session 2025, HB814.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 62-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-2. Declaration of policy.
(a) Upon investigation, it has been determined that the rates, services and operations of
public utilities as defined herein, are affected with the public interest and that the availability of
an adequate and reliable supply of electric power and natural gas to the people, economy and
government of North Carolina is a matter of public policy. It is hereby declared to be the policy
of the State of North Carolina:
…
(11) To promote, to the maximum extent practicable, the deployment of advanced
conductors and grid enhancing technologies to transport the regulated public
utilities' electric energy supply in the most efficient means practicable. To that
end, to require transmission planning to be coordinated with energy planning
and the fixing of rates in a manner to result in the least cost mix of generation
and transmission capital expenditure that is achievable.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 62-100 reads as rewritten:
"Article 5A.
"Siting of Transmission Lines.
"§ 62-100. Definitions.
As used in this Article:
(1) The term "begin to construct" includes Advanced conductors. – Any
conductor that has a direct current electrical resistance at least ten percent
(10%) lower than aluminum conductor steel reinforced lines of a similar
diameter.
(1a) Begin to construct. – Includes any clearing of land, excavation, or other action
that would adversely affect the natural environment of the route of a
transmission line; but that term does not include land surveys, boring to
ascertain geological conditions, or similar preliminary work undertaken to
determine the suitability of proposed routes for a transmission line that results
in temporary changes to the land.
*H814-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The word "county" means any County. – Any one of the counties listed in
G.S. 153A-10.
(2a) Grid enhancing technology. – Any hardware or software technology that
enhances the performance or improves the efficiency of a transmission
system. Includes energy storage as a transmission asset, dynamic line ratings,
advanced power flow control technology, topology optimization, and flexible
alternating current transmission systems.
(3) The word "land" means any Land. – Any real estate or any estate or interest
in real estate, including water and riparian rights, regardless of the use to
which it is devoted.
(4) The word "lines" means distribution Lines. – Distribution lines and
transmission lines collectively.
(5) The word "municipality" means any Municipality. – Any incorporated
community, whether designated as a city, town, or village and any area over
which it exercises any of the powers granted by Chapter 160D of the General
Statutes.
(6) The term "public utility" means any Public utility. – Any of the following:
a. A public utility, as defined in G.S. 62-3(23).
b. An electric membership corporation.
c. A joint municipal power agency.
d. A city or county that is engaged in producing, generating, transmitting,
delivering, or furnishing electricity for private or public use.
(7) The term "transmission line" means an Transmission line. – An electric line
designed with a capacity of at least 161 kilovolts."
SECTION 3. G.S. 62-101 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-101. Certificate to construct transmission line.
…
(c) A certificate is not required for construction of any of the following lines:
(1) A line designed to carry less than 161 kilovolts;kilovolts.
(2) The replacement or expansion of an existing line with a similar line in
substantially the same location, or the rebuilding, upgrading, modifying,
modernizing, or reconstructing of an existing line for the purpose of increasing
capacity by no greater than seventy-five percent (75%) of the existing lines or
widening an existing right-of-way;right-of-way.
(2a) The upgrading, modifying, modernizing, or reconstructing of an existing line
for the purpose of increasing capacity solely through the deployment of
advanced conductors and/or grid enhancing technologies for any of the
following purposes:
a. Increasing transmission capacity.
b. Increasing transmission efficiency.
c. Reducing system congestion.
d. Reducing curtailment of energy generation resources.
e. Increasing reliability.
f. Increasing resiliency.
g. Increasing capacity to connect new generation resources.
(3) A transmission line over which the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
has licensing jurisdiction, if the Commission determines that agency has
conducted a proceeding substantially equivalent to the proceeding required by
this Article;Article.
(4) Any transmission line for which, before March 6, 1989, a public utility or
other person has surveyed a proposed route and, based on that route, has
Page 2 House Bill 814-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
acquired rights-of-way for it by voluntary conveyances or has filed
condemnation proceedings for acquiring those rights-of-way which, together,
involve twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the total length of the proposed
route;route.
(5) An electric membership corporation owned transmission line for which the
construction or upgrading has had a proceeding conducted which the
Commission determines is substantially equivalent to the proceeding required
by this Article;Article.
(6) Any line owned by a municipality to be constructed wholly within the
corporate limits of that municipality.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 62-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-102. Application for certificate.
(a) An applicant for the certificate described in G.S. 62-101 shall file an application with
the Commission containing all of the following information:
(1) The reasons the transmission line is needed;needed.
(2) A description of the proposed location of the transmission line;line.
(3) A description of the proposed transmission line;line.
(3a) Descriptions of any advanced reconductoring and/or grid enhancing
technologies to be utilized and a summary of the costs and benefits, including,
but not limited to, all of the following:
a. Increasing transmission capacity.
b. Increasing transmission efficiency.
c. Reducing system congestion.
d. Reducing curtailment of energy generation resources.
e. Increasing reliability.
f. Increasing resiliency.
g. Increasing capacity to connect new generation resources.
(3b) A description of any alternatives, including alternative configurations of
advanced reconductoring and/or grid enhancing technologies, evaluated but
not selected for the proposed transmission line and a summary of the costs and
benefits of these alternatives.
(4) An environmental report setting forth:forth all of the following:
a. The environmental impact of the proposed action;action.
b. Any proposed mitigating measures that may minimize the
environmental impact; andimpact.
c. Alternatives to the proposed action.
(5) A list of all necessary approvals that the applicant must obtain before it may
begin to construct the transmission line; andline.
(6) Any other information the Commission requires.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 62-110.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-110.9. Requirements concerning reductions in emissions of carbon dioxide from
electric public utilities.
The Utilities Commission shall take all reasonable steps to achieve a seventy percent (70%)
reduction in emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2) emitted in the State from electric generating
facilities owned or operated by electric public utilities from 2005 levels by the year 2030 and
carbon neutrality by the year 2050. For purposes of this section, (i) "electric public utility" means
any electric public utility as defined in G.S. 62-3(23) serving at least 150,000 North Carolina
retail jurisdictional customers as of January 1, 2021, and (ii) "carbon neutrality" means for every
ton of CO2 emitted in the State from electric generating facilities owned or operated by or on
House Bill 814-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
behalf of electric public utilities, an equivalent amount of CO2 is reduced, removed, prevented,
or offset, provided that the offsets are verifiable and do not exceed five percent (5%) of the
authorized reduction goal. In achieving the authorized carbon reduction goals, the Utilities
Commission shall:
…
(3) Ensure any generation and resource changes maintain or improve upon the
adequacy and reliability of the existing grid. The Carbon Plan shall require the
electric public utility to produce a report demonstrating it evaluated a range of
cost-effective transmission and distribution solutions, including advanced
reconductoring and/or grid enhancing technologies as defined in G.S. 62-100,
joint projects with neighboring and other regional utilities, other upgrades to
existing facilities, and other best practices. The report should include
descriptions of any advanced reconductoring and/or grid enhancing
technologies to be utilized and a summary of costs and benefits, and a
description of any alternatives, including alternative configurations of
advanced conductoring and/or grid enhancing technologies, evaluated but not
selected in the Carbon Plan and a summary of the costs and benefits of these
alternatives. The electric public utility shall also include all of the following
in the report:
a. Updates to the utility's transmission plan under the utility's open access
transmission tariff pursuant to the federal jurisdictional planning
process. In this report, the utility shall, when applicable, describe
planned transmission improvements specific to siting of new resources
expected to impact interconnection constraints or other operations of
the systems. The utility shall also describe how it evaluated alternate
transmission technologies when developing solutions for identified
transmission needs for interconnecting new generation resources.
b. A description of how transmission factored into the utility's evaluation
of the range of future scenarios included in the 15-year time period of
the utility's resource plan, including the retirement of the utility's coal
generation.
c. A discussion of transmission considerations for facilities included in
the utility's preferred resource plan for which there are particular sites
specified.
…."
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 814-First Edition